South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3083.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 48-1-110(e) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (e)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, negligently or wilfully, to discharge any air contaminant or other substance in the ambient air that shall cause an undesirable level. (2) The intentional injection, release, dispersion, or other emission, by any means, of chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, apparatus, or other air contaminants within the borders of this State with the express purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the intensity of the sunlight is prohibited. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----